Hawaii statutes.
§514A-87
Personal application. (a) All
apartment owners, tenants of such owners, employees of owners and tenants, or
any other persons that may in any manner use property or any part thereof
submitted to this chapter are subject to this chapter and to the declaration
and bylaws of the association of apartment owners adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(b) All
agreements, decisions, and determinations lawfully made by the association of
apartment owners in accordance with the voting percentages established in this
chapter, the declaration, or the bylaws are binding on all apartment owners. [L
2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next